Utah statutes.
6-1-4.   Inventory -- Bond.

The assignee shall forthwith file with the clerk of the district court of the county where the property assigned is located a true and full inventory and valuation of said estate, under oath, so far as the same has come to his knowledge, and shall then enter into bonds to the state for the use of the creditors in double the amount of the inventory and valuation, with one or more sureties to be approved by said clerk, for the faithful performance of said trust; and the assignee may thereupon proceed to perform any duty necessary to carry into effect the purpose of said assignment.

